Hawaii, session 2025, SB28.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that delays in obtaining permits and approvals substantially increase the time and cost required to build new housing.  A study by the University of Hawaii Economic Research Organization on the burden of housing regulation indicates that the average length of approval delay in Hawaii is three times the national mean, leading to uncertainty and expense that disincentivizes development. According to research by the Grassroot Institute of Hawaii, the time required to navigate the approval process for new housing developments can take as long as ten years.  This can considerably increase the cost associated with building new homes.  In September 2012, the median home price on Oahu was $637,000.  Ten years later, in September 2022, the median home price skyrocketed to $1,100,000. Under existing law, six out of the nine members of the land use commission must affirmatively vote to approve any boundary amendment. The legislature further finds that adjusting the laws governing the land use commission approval process will expedite the development process and help address the State's excessive permit and approval times. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to specify that a simple majority of affirmative votes of the members of the land use commission present at a meeting and qualified to vote is required for any boundary amendment. SECTION 2.  Section 205-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There shall be a state land use commission, hereinafter called the commission.  The commission shall consist of nine members who shall hold no other public office and shall be appointed in the manner and serve for the term set forth in section 26-34.  One member shall be appointed from each of the counties and the remainder shall be appointed at large; provided that one member shall have substantial experience or expertise in traditional Hawaiian land usage and knowledge of cultural land practices.  The commission shall elect its chairperson from one of its members.  The members shall receive no compensation for their services on the commission, but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.  [Six] A simple majority of affirmative votes of the members present and qualified to vote shall be necessary for any boundary amendment." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________